Hawaii, session 2025, HB1462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 86, Session Laws of Hawaii 2024, established a crisis intervention and diversion services program within the department of health to expand existing services and divert those with mental health issues to appropriate health care services.  This program, along with the new behavioral health crisis center at the Iwilei resource center, connects individuals, including those who are homeless or at risk of homelessness, to appropriate crisis services and other community resources. While these programs have proven successful, often the scope of the programs is not enough to cover all areas of the State. The legislature further finds that homelessness is a significant issue on Oahu, with a noticeable presence of unsheltered individuals, some of whom suffer from issues relating to drugs, alcohol, or mental illness and do not have access to the appropriate services for help. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to expand the crisis intervention and diversion services program by establishing two crisis intervention and diversion services sites on Oahu. SECTION 2.  Section 334-171, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  There shall be established within the department a crisis intervention and diversion services program to redirect persons experiencing mental health disorders and co-occurring mental health and substance use disorders who are at risk for involvement, or currently involved, with the criminal justice system to the appropriate health care system and services.  The program shall establish at least two crisis intervention and diversion services sites on the island of Oahu; provided that of the two sites on Oahu, one site shall be located in an area for which data shows disproportionate numbers of individuals with mental health conditions, substance use disorders, or homelessness.  The department shall collaborate with law enforcement agencies, courts, mental health providers, and the community for the execution and implementation of these services." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purposes of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on December 31, 2050.